California statutes. Water Code
(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4327.

The statement shall be submitted on or before the first day of September of the year preceding that for which it is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 29.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4329.

The association shall pay the total amount apportioned to it to the department on or before the first day of December next succeeding the receipt of the statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------

4330.

The department shall deposit the money in the Water Resources Revolving Fund to the credit of the amount of the service area affected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------

4331.

The department may refuse to render watermaster service to such service area during any calendar year next succeeding the first day of December of any year during which the association fails to pay the total amount apportioned to it on or before the first day of December of such year.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4334.

All of the provisions of this chapter relating to the expenses of service areas which are not in conflict with this article shall apply to expenses of service areas under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

4335.

If, at the time of creation of a service area, all the owners have formed an association by agreement in writing and have filed a certified copy of the agreement as provided in this article, the department need not file a certified copy of the order creating the service area or a description of the land within the service area in the office of any county recorder.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1943, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. The Water Resources Revolving Fund [4351. - 4358.]

4351.

Separate accounts shall be established in the fund to the credit of the various service areas now in existence or hereafter created from time to time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------

4357.

The expenditures for the supervision of the distribution of water in any service area shall be paid from that portion or account of the Water Resources Revolving Fund credited on the department’s books to that service area, upon claims approved by the department and otherwise audited and approved as may be required in the case of other claims against the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 30.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

4358.

Any money remaining in the watermaster service area accounts of the Water Resources Revolving Fund at the end of any year shall be available for use the following year for the respective service areas to which credited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1411.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Alternative Distribution Procedure [4400. - 4407.]

4400.

The foregoing provisions of this part shall be applicable to this chapter, so far as adaptable thereto or consistent therewith, and whenever rights to water have been ascertained and determined as specified in Section 4027 the department may elect to proceed under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 657.)
-------------------------------------------

4401.

Insofar as the foregoing provisions of this part may not be adaptable to or may be inconsistent with the provisions of any decree of court, the department may conform to the requirements of such decree of court and observe the foregoing provisions of this part only insofar as the same may be adaptable to or consistent with such decree of court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 657.)
-------------------------------------------

4402.

In the event an order or decree of court provides for an allocation among and payment of costs of water distribution by the owners of the rights decreed, the department, in lieu of the procedures provided in the foregoing provisions of this part for allocation and payment of costs, may proceed in accordance with such decree and as hereinafter provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 657.)
-------------------------------------------

4403.

A certified copy of the order or decree shall be recorded in the county or counties wherein the water is diverted or used and a certified copy filed in the office of the department and such recordation and filing shall constitute constructive notice of the provisions of the order or decree to the owners of the rights decreed and their successors in interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 657.)
-------------------------------------------

4404.

Obligations to pay for the respective allocations of cost set forth in the order or decree may be enforced by the department against the respective owners or their successors by execution or as may be otherwise provided in such order or decree.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 657.)
-------------------------------------------

4406.

The total sum thus made available shall be subject to expenditure by the department in performing said work, and any money remaining at the end of any year shall be available for use the following year for the respective watermaster district to which credited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 657.)
-------------------------------------------

4407.

Any moneys collected or received by the department for or on account of owners of the rights involved may be placed in a special deposit fund and paid out in accordance with the provisions of the order or decree or as provided for by the agreement between the owners of the rights affected thereby.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 657.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. RECORDATION OF WATER EXTRACTIONS AND DIVERSIONS [4999. - 5009.]

4999.

The Legislature finds and declares that by reason of the combination of light rainfall, concentrated population, the transition of considerable areas of land from agricultural use to urban use, and a similar dependence on ground water supplies which prevails in the Counties of Riverside, San Bernardino, Los Angeles, and Ventura, together with the fact that most such underground water supplies are overdrawn, it is necessary that the provisions of this part apply to said counties only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

5000.

As used in this Part 5, the following terms shall have the respective meanings stated below, viz:

(a) “Ground water” means water beneath the surface of the ground whether or not flowing through known and definite channels.

(b) “Surface water” means water on the surface of the ground.

(c) “Four counties” means the Counties of Riverside, San Bernardino, Los Angeles, and Ventura.

(d) “Person” means all persons whether natural or artificial, including the United States of America, the State of California, and all political subdivisions, districts, municipalities and public agencies of or in either the State or the United States.

(e) “Sources” means any point of diversion or extraction of water and includes among other things wells, tunnels, and headworks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

5001.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), each person who, after 1955, extracts ground water in excess of 25 acre-feet in any year shall file with the board a “Notice of Extraction and Diversion of Water” (hereinafter called “notice”) in the form provided in Section 5002, as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) (1) For extractions after December 31, 1955, and before January 1, 2021, the notice shall be filed before March 1 of the year after the extraction.

(2) For extractions after December 31, 2020, and before October 1, 2021, the notice shall be filed before February 1, 2022.

(3) For extractions after September 30, 2021, the notice shall include extractions during the one-year period from October 1 of each year through September 30, inclusive, of the following year, and shall be filed before February 1 of the year after that one-year period.

(c) No notice need be filed with respect to, and there shall not be required to be included in a notice, any of the following:

(1) Information concerning the extraction or diversion of water from a source from which less than 10 acre-feet has been taken during the year.

(2) Information concerning a taking or diversion of surface water for the purpose of generating electrical energy and other nonconsumptive uses, and for incidental uses in connection with that taking or diversion.

(3) Information concerning extractions or diversions of water that are included in annual reports filed with a court or the board by a watermaster appointed by a court or pursuant to statute to administer a final judgment determining rights to water, which reports identify the persons who have extracted or diverted water and give the general place of use and the quantity of water that has been extracted or diverted from each source.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 43.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.

Each notice shall be on a form provided by the board. The first notice filed by any person shall state:

(a) The name of the person extracting ground water or diverting surface water. 

(b) The quantity of water taken and the method of measurement used by such person or his predecessor in interest in each preceding year from each surface or ground water source; provided, that if the period of such taking exceeds 10 years, such person is not required to state such quantities for any period greater than the preceding 10 calendar years.

(c) The location (sufficient for identification) of each surface or ground water source through or by means of which water has been taken, and if any person or persons other than the person filing said notice claims any interest in such source or the right to extract water therefrom, the name or names, so far as known, of such other person or persons.

(d) A general description of the area in which such water has been used.

(e) Any other facts which the board may require by general regulation and which tend to prove the facts required by this section to be stated, the origin of water supplying any ground water source mentioned in the notice, water levels in any such source, or the extent of any ground water basin from which such water is withdrawn.

(f) Any person diverting only surface water and not more than 25 acre-feet of ground water in any year need not file such notice for such year.

Notices, other than the first notice filed, shall state, in addition to the name of the person extracting or diverting such water:

First: The quantity of water taken from each surface and ground water source from which such person received any water in the preceding calendar year.

Second: Location of each such surface and ground water source through or by means of which water has been taken in such preceding year. This may be stated, so far as applicable, by reference to the water sources described in the original notice.

Third: If such person diverts surface water in excess of three miner’s inches, such person shall further state in said notice the period or periods of such diversion, and the maximum and minimum flows so diverted in each period.

Fourth: Any other facts which the board may require by general regulation, and which tend to prove facts required by this subdivision to be stated, the origin of water supplying any surface or ground water source mentioned in the notice, water levels or flow in any such source, or the extent or origin of the water source supplying the ground water supply from which such water is extracted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.

No prescriptive right that might otherwise accrue to extract ground water shall arise or accrue to, nor shall any statute of limitations operate in regard to the ground water in the four counties after the year 1956 in favor of any person required to file a notice of extraction and diversion of water, until that person files with the board the first “Notice of Extraction and Diversion of Water” substantially in the form mentioned in Section 5002. As to each person who fails to file that notice by the end of the year in 1957, it shall be deemed for the period from that time until the first notice of the person is filed, that no claim of right to the extraction of ground water from any source in the four counties has been made by the person, and that water extracted by the person from the ground water source during that period has not been devoted to or used for any beneficial use. The beneficial use of water from any ground water source within the four counties in any year by the person shall be deemed not to exceed the quantity reported in the notice filed for that year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 669.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5004.

After the year 1959, failure to file with the board a notice for any calendar year within six months after the close of such calendar year shall be deemed equivalent for all purposes to nonuse for such year of any ground water within the four counties by each person failing to so file a notice within said period; provided, that this section and Section 5003 shall not apply to any person whose aggregate extractions of ground water in any year does not exceed 25 acre-feet nor to any extractions of ground water with respect to which no notice is required to be filed under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 526.)
-------------------------------------------

5005.

Except as specified in Section 5004, failure to file the notice or delay in filing the same shall not cause the loss of rights to ground water which existed on January 1, 1956.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1869.)
-------------------------------------------

5006.

Each notice shall be sworn to and shall be accompanied by a filing fee which shall be fixed by the board pursuant to Section 1529.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 741, Sec. 90.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5007.

Any person may apply to the board to investigate the facts stated in any specified notice so filed and to state in writing its determination of the facts found by it upon such investigation. The cost of such investigation and determination shall be paid by such applicant by such deposits or in such payments as may be fixed by the board. In the event the board makes a determination which differs in any material respect from the facts contained in the notice, then, prior to making its final determination, the board shall notify both the person filing said notice and the person requesting a determination of facts of its proposed findings, and shall invite either party to submit further information prior to making its final determination, and no such final determination shall be made until sixty (60) days after the parties have been so notified of the board’s proposed determination.

In any action or proceeding hereafter pending in which the facts, or any of them, contained in the notices so filed are material, such notices shall not be evidence of any fact stated therein, but such determination by the board shall be prima facie evidence of said facts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

5008.

The making of any willful misstatement in any notice shall be a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not to exceed six months, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 408.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

5009.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, on and after January 1, 2005, each person who extracts groundwater in a board-designated local area, and who is otherwise subject to this part, shall file the required notice with the appropriate local agency designated pursuant to subdivision (e), instead of the board, in accordance with this part. The notice shall be on a form provided by the local agency and the content of the form shall be determined by the local agency in accordance with Section 5002. To the extent possible, the form shall consolidate the notice required under this section with other reports required by the local agency relating to the extraction of groundwater.

(2) A person who is subject to this section is subject to this part in the same manner and to the same extent as a person who files his or her notice with the board.

(b) Each notice filed with the local agency may include a filing fee determined by the local agency. If the local agency chooses to impose a filing fee, the local agency shall calculate the amount of the fee to pay for administrative expenses incurred in connection with the processing, compiling, and retaining of the notices, but in no event shall the fee amount exceed that amount charged by the board pursuant to Section 5006.

(c) The local agency shall make available to governmental agencies the information collected pursuant to this section.

(d) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Board-designated local area” means the area entirely within the jurisdiction of the local agency that the board has determined shall be subject to this section, and any area for which the local agency has formally agreed to accept the required notice.

(2) “Local agency” means the local public agency or court appointed watermaster that has been designated by the board in accordance with subdivision (e).

(e) The board shall designate an entity as a local agency for the purposes of this section, if the board determines that all of the following apply:

(1) The entity has volunteered to be designated.

(2) The entity has responsibilities relating to the extraction or use of groundwater.

(3) The entity has made satisfactory arrangements with the board to identify which groundwater extractors are within the designated local area and to avoid the submission of notices to both the board and one or more local agencies.

(4) The entity has made satisfactory arrangements with the board to maintain records filed under this part for extractions within the designated local area, and to make those records available to governmental agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 374, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.1. STATEMENTS OF WATER DIVERSIONS AND USE [5100. - 5107.]

5100.

As used in this part:

(a) “Best available technologies” means technologies at the highest technically practical level, using flow totaling devices, and if necessary, data loggers and telemetry.

(b) “Best professional practices” means practices attaining and maintaining the accuracy of measurement and reporting devices and methods.

(c) “Diversion” means taking water by gravity or pumping from a surface stream or subterranean stream flowing through a known and definite channel, or other body of surface water, into a canal, pipeline, or other conduit, and includes impoundment of
 water in a reservoir.

(d) “Person” means all persons whether natural or artificial, including the United States of America, State of California, and all political subdivisions, districts, municipalities, and public agencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 3.   (SB 8 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

5101.

(a) Each person who, after December 31, 1965, diverts water shall file with the board a statement of their diversion and use, as provided in subdivision (b), except that a statement is not required to be filed if the diversion is any of the following:

(1) From a spring that does not flow off the property on which it is located and from which the person’s aggregate diversions do not exceed 25 acre-feet in any year.

(2) Covered by a registration for small domestic use, small irrigation use, or livestock stockpond use, or permit or license to appropriate water on file with the board.

(3) Included in a notice filed pursuant to Part 5
 (commencing with Section 4999).

(4) Regulated by a watermaster appointed by the department and included in annual reports filed with a court or the board by the watermaster, which reports identify the persons who have diverted water and describe the general purposes and the place, the use, and the quantity of water that has been diverted from each source.

(5) Included in annual reports filed with a court or the board by a watermaster appointed by a court or pursuant to statute to administer a final judgment determining rights to water, which reports identify the persons who have diverted water and give the general place of use and the quantity of water that has been diverted from each source.

(6) For use in compliance with Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 1226) or Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 1228) of
 Chapter 1 of Part 2.

(7) A diversion that occurs before January 1, 2009, if any of the following applies:

(A) The diversion is from a spring that does not flow off the property on which it is located, and the person’s aggregate diversions do not exceed 25 acre-feet in any year.

(B) The diversion is covered by an application to appropriate water on file with the board.

(C) The diversion is reported by the department in its hydrologic data bulletins.

(D) The diversion is included in the consumptive use data for the Delta lowlands published by the department in its hydrologic data bulletins.

(b) (1) For
 diversions after December 31, 1965, and before January 1, 2021, the statement shall be filed before July 1 of the year after the diversion.

(2) For diversions after December 31, 2020, and before October 1, 2021, the statement shall be filed before April 1, 2022.

(3) For diversions after September 30, 2021, the statement shall include diversions during the one-year period from October 1 of each year through September 30, inclusive, of the following year, and shall be filed before February 1 of the year after that one-year period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 44.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5102.

The statement may be filed either by the person who is diverting water or, on his behalf, by an agency which he designates and which maintains a record of the water diverted. A separate statement shall be filed for each point of diversion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

5103.

Each statement shall be prepared on a form provided by the board. The statement shall include all of the following information:

(a) The name and address of the person who diverted water and of the person filing the statement.

(b) The name of the stream or other source from which water was diverted, and the name of the next major stream or other body of water to which the source is tributary.

(c) The place of diversion. The location of the diversion works shall be depicted on a specific United States Geological Survey topographic map, or shall be identified using the California Coordinate System, or latitude and
 longitude measurements. If assigned, the public land description to the nearest 40-acre subdivision and the assessor’s parcel number shall also be provided.

(d) The capacity of the diversion works and of the storage reservoir, if any, and the months in which water was used during the preceding calendar year.

(e) (1) (A) At least monthly records of water diversions. The measurements of the diversion shall be made in accordance with Section 1840.

(B) (i) On and after July 1, 2016, the measurement of a diversion of 10 acre-feet or more per year shall comply with regulations adopted by the board pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1840) of Chapter 12 of Part 2.

(ii) The requirement
 of clause (i) is extended to January 1, 2017, for any statement filer that enters into a voluntary agreement that is acceptable to the board to reduce the statement filer’s diversions during the 2015 irrigation season.

(2) (A) The terms of, and eligibility for, any grant or loan awarded or administered by the department, the board, or the California Bay-Delta Authority on behalf of a person that is subject to paragraph (1) shall be conditioned on compliance with that paragraph.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the board may determine that a person is eligible for a grant or loan even though the person is not complying with paragraph (1), if both of the following apply:

(i) The board determines that the grant or loan will assist the grantee or loan recipient in complying with paragraph
 (1).

(ii) The person has submitted to the board a one-year schedule for complying with paragraph (1).

(C) It is the intent of the Legislature that the requirements of this subdivision shall complement and not affect the scope of authority granted to the board by provisions of law other than this article.

(f) (1) The purpose of use.

(2) The amount of water used, if any, for cannabis cultivation.

(g) A general description of the area in which the water was used. The location of the place of use shall be depicted on a specific United States Geological Survey topographic map and on any other maps with identifiable landmarks. If assigned, the public land description to the
 nearest 40-acre subdivision and the assessor’s parcel number shall also be provided.

(h) The year in which the diversion was commenced as near as is known.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 32, Sec. 103.   (SB 837)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5104.

(a) Supplemental statements shall be filed annually, as provided in subdivision (b). They shall contain the quantity of water diverted and the rate of diversion by months in the preceding calendar year and any change in the other information contained in the preceding statement.

(b) (1) For diversions before January 1, 2021, a supplemental statement required under this section shall be filed before July 1 of the year after the diversion.

(2) For diversions after December 31, 2020, and before October 1, 2021, the supplemental statement shall be filed before April 1, 2022.

(3) For diversions after September 30, 2021,
 the supplemental statement shall include diversions during the one-year period from October 1 of each year through September 30, inclusive, of the following year, and shall be filed before February 1 of the year after that one-year period.

(c) If there is a change in the name or address of the person diverting the water, a supplemental statement shall be filed with the board that includes the change in name or address.

(d) A supplemental statement filed prior to July 1, 2016, shall include data satisfying the requirements of subdivision (a) for any diversion of water in the 2012, 2013, and 2014 calendar years, that was not reported in a supplemental statement submitted prior to July 1, 2015.

(e) This section does not limit the authority of the board to require additional information or more frequent reporting under
 any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 45.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5105.

Upon failure of any person to file a statement required by this part, the board may, at the expense of such person, investigate and determine in writing the facts required by either Sections 5103 or 5104, provided the board first gives such person written notice of its intention to investigate and determine the facts and 60 days in which to file the statement without penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1430.)
-------------------------------------------

5106.

(a) Neither the statements submitted under this part nor the determination of facts by the board pursuant to Section 5105 shall establish or constitute evidence of a right to divert or use water.

(b) (1) The board may rely on the names and addresses included in statements submitted under this part for the purpose of determining the names and addresses of persons who are to receive notices with regard to proceedings before the board.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), any person may submit, in writing, a request to the board to provide notification to a different address, and the board shall provide the notification to that address.

(3) If the board provides notice to persons who file statements under this part, the notice shall not be determined to be inadequate on the basis that notice was not received by a person, other than a party to whom the board’s action is directed, who fails to file a statement required to be filed under this part.

(4) This subdivision does not affect the requirement in Section 2527 to provide notice to all persons who own land that appears to be riparian to the stream system.

(c) In any proceeding before the board to determine whether an application for a permit to appropriate water should be approved, any statement submitted under this part or determination by the board pursuant to Section 5105 is evidence of the facts stated therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 323, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5107.

(a) The making of any willful misstatement pursuant to this part is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not to exceed six months, or both.

(b) Any person who fails to file a statement required to be filed under this part for a diversion or use that occurs after January 1, 2009, who tampers with any measuring device, or who makes a material misstatement pursuant to this part may be liable civilly as provided in subdivisions (c) and (d).

(c) Civil liability may be administratively imposed by the board pursuant to Section 1055 in an amount
 not to exceed the following amounts:

(1) For failure to file a statement, one thousand dollars ($1,000), plus five hundred dollars ($500) per day for each additional day on which the violation continues if the person fails to file a statement within 30 days after the board has called the violation to the attention of that person.

(2) For a violation resulting from a physical malfunction of a measuring device not caused by the person or any other unintentional misstatement, two hundred fifty dollars ($250), plus two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per day for each additional day on which the measuring device continues to malfunction or the misstatement is not corrected if the person fails to correct or repair the measuring device or correct the misstatement within 60 days after the board has called the malfunction or violation to the attention of that person.

(3) For knowingly tampering with any measuring device or knowingly making a material misstatement in a statement filed under this part, twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), plus one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day on which the violation continues if the person fails to correct the violation within 30 days after the board has called the violation to the attention of that person.

(4) For any other violation, five hundred dollars ($500), plus two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each additional day on which the violation continues if the person fails to correct the violation within 30 days after the board has called the violation to the attention of that person.

(d) When an additional penalty may be imposed under subdivision (c) for failure to correct a violation or correct or repair a malfunctioning measuring
 device within a specified period after the violation has been called to a person’s attention by the board, the board, for good cause, may provide for a longer period for correction of the problem, and the additional penalty shall not apply if the violation is corrected within the period specified by the board.

(e) In determining the appropriate amount, the board shall consider all relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, all of the following factors:

(1) The extent of harm caused by the violation.

(2) The nature and persistence of the violation.

(3) The length of time over which the violation occurs.

(4) Any corrective action undertaken by the violator.

(f) All funds recovered pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Water Rights Fund established pursuant to Section 1550.

(g) Remedies under this section are in addition to, and do not supersede or limit, any other remedies, civil or criminal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 6.   (SB 8 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5.2. Groundwater Extraction Reporting for Probationary Basins and Basins Without a Groundwater Sustainability Agency [5200. - 5209.]

5200.

The Legislature finds and declares that this part establishes groundwater reporting requirements for the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 10724 and Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 10735) of Part 2.74 of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 10.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5201.

As used in this part:

(a) “Basin” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(b) “Board-designated local area” has the same meaning as defined in Section 5009.

(c) “De minimis extractor” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(d) “Groundwater” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(e) “Groundwater extraction facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(f) “Groundwater sustainability agency” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(g) “Person” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10735.

(h) “Personal information” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code. 

(i) “Probationary basin” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10735.

(j) “Water year” has the same meaning as defined in Section 10721.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 10.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5202.

(a) This section applies to a person who does either of the following:

(1) Extracts groundwater from a probationary basin 90 days or more after the board designates the basin as a probationary basin pursuant to Section 10735.2.

(2) Extracts groundwater on or after July 1, 2017, in an area within a high- or medium-priority basin subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 10720.7 that is not within the management area of a groundwater sustainability agency and where the county does not assume responsibility to be the groundwater sustainability agency, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 10724.

(b) Except as provided in
 subdivision (c), a person subject to this section shall file a report of groundwater extraction by February 1 of each year for extractions made in the preceding water year.

(c) Unless reporting is required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 10735.2, this section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) An extraction by a de minimis extractor.

(2) An extraction excluded from reporting pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 10735.2.

(3) An extraction reported pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 4999).

(4) An extraction that is included in annual reports filed with a court or the board by a watermaster appointed by a court or pursuant to
 statute to administer a final judgment determining rights to water. The reports shall identify the persons who have extracted water and give the general place of use and the quantity of water that has been extracted from each source.

(d) Except as provided in Section 5209, the report shall be filed with the board.

(e) The report may be filed by the person extracting water or on that person’s behalf by an agency that person designates and that maintains a record of the water extracted.

(f) Each report shall be accompanied by the fee imposed pursuant to Section 1529.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 258, Sec. 46.   (SB 155)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5203.

Each report shall be prepared on a form provided by the board. The report shall include all of the following information:

(a) The name and address of the person who extracted groundwater and of the person filing the report.

(b) The name of the basin from which groundwater was extracted.

(c) The place of groundwater extraction. The location of the groundwater extraction facilities shall be depicted on a specific United States Geological Survey topographic map or shall be identified using the California Coordinate System or a latitude and longitude measurement. If assigned, the public land
 description to the nearest 40-acre subdivision and the assessor’s parcel number shall be provided.

(d) The capacity of the groundwater extraction facilities.

(e) Monthly records of groundwater extractions. The measurements of the extractions shall be made by a methodology, water-measuring device, or combination thereof satisfactory to the board.

(f) The purpose of use.

(g) A general description of the area in which the water was used. The location of the place of use shall be depicted on a specific United States Geological Survey topographic map or on any other maps with identifiable landmarks. If assigned, the public land description to the nearest 40-acre subdivision and the assessor’s parcel number shall also be provided.

(h) As near as is known, the year in which the groundwater extraction was commenced.

(i) Any information required pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 10735.2.

(j) Any other information that the board may require by regulation and that is reasonably necessary for purposes of this division or Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 10.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5204.

(a) If a person fails to file a report as required by this part, the board may, at the expense of that person, investigate and determine the information required to be reported pursuant to this part.

(b) The board shall give a person described in subdivision (a) notice of its intention to investigate and determine the information required to be reported pursuant to this part and 60 days in which to file a required report without penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 347, Sec. 10.   (AB 1739)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

5205.

A report submitted under this part or a determination of facts by the board pursuant to Section 5105 shall not establish or constitute evidence of a right to divert or use water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 401, Sec. 20.   (AB 1520)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

5206.

Personal information included in a report of groundwater extraction shall have the same protection from disclosure as is provided for information concerning utility customers of local agencies pursuant to Section 7927.410 of the Government Code.
